Florida, session 2026, HB719.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:
27
28 Section 1. Paragraph (k) of subsection (2), paragraphs
29 (a), (b), (f), (g), and (i) of subsection (4), and paragraphs
30 (a) and (d) of subsection (7) of section 381.986, Florida
31 Statutes, are amended to read:
32 381.986 Medical use of marijuana.—
33 (2) QUALIFYING MEDICAL CONDITIONS.—A patient must be
34 diagnosed with at least one of the following conditions to
35 qualify to receive marijuana or a marijuana delivery device:
36 (k) Medical conditions of the same kind or class as or
37 comparable to those enumerated in paragraphs (a)-(j) or for
38 which the patient has been prescribed an opioid drug listed as a
39 Schedule II controlled substance in s. 893.03 or 21 U.S.C. s.
40 812.
41 (4) PHYSICIAN CERTIFICATION.—
42 (a) A qualified physician may issue a physician
43 certification only if the qualified physician:
44 1. Conducted an examination of the patient and a full
45 assessment of the medical history of the patient. Before issuing
46 a an initial certification to a patient or renewing a
47 certification, the qualified physician must conduct an in-person
48 physical examination of the patient or an. For certification
49 renewals, a qualified physician who has issued a certification
50 to a patient after conducting an in-person physical examination
Page 2 of 10
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb719-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 719 2026
51 may conduct subsequent examinations of that patient through
52 telehealth as defined in s. 456.47. For the purposes of this
53 subparagraph, the term "in-person physical examination" means an
54 examination conducted by a qualified physician while the
55 physician is physically present in the same room as the patient.
56 2. Diagnosed the patient with at least one qualifying
57 medical condition.
58 3. Determined that the medical use of marijuana would
59 likely outweigh the potential health risks for the patient, and
60 such determination must be documented in the patient's medical
61 record. If a patient is younger than 18 years of age, a second
62 physician must concur with this determination, and such
63 concurrence must be documented in the patient's medical record.
64 4. Determined whether the patient is pregnant and
65 documented such determination in the patient's medical record. A
66 physician may not issue a physician certification, except for
67 low-THC cannabis, to a patient who is pregnant.
68 5. Reviewed the patient's controlled drug prescription
69 history in the prescription drug monitoring program database
70 established pursuant to s. 893.055.
71 6. Reviews the medical marijuana use registry and
72 confirmed that the patient does not have an active physician
73 certification from another qualified physician.
74 7. Registers as the issuer of the physician certification
75 for the named qualified patient on the medical marijuana use
Page 3 of 10
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb719-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 719 2026
76 registry in an electronic manner determined by the department,
77 and:
78 a. Enters into the registry the contents of the physician
79 certification, including the patient's qualifying condition and
80 the dosage not to exceed the daily dose amount determined by the
81 department, the amount and forms of marijuana authorized for the
82 patient, and any types of marijuana delivery devices needed by
83 the patient for the medical use of marijuana.
84 b. Updates the registry within 7 days after any change is
85 made to the original physician certification to reflect such
86 change.
87 c. Deactivates the registration of the qualified patient
88 and the patient's caregiver when the physician no longer
89 recommends the medical use of marijuana for the patient.
90 8. Obtains the voluntary and informed written consent of
91 the patient for medical use of marijuana each time the qualified
92 physician issues a physician certification for the patient,
93 which shall be maintained in the patient's medical record. The
94 patient, or the patient's parent or legal guardian if the
95 patient is a minor, must sign the informed consent acknowledging
96 that the qualified physician has sufficiently explained its
97 content. The qualified physician must use a standardized
98 informed consent form adopted in rule by the Board of Medicine
99 and the Board of Osteopathic Medicine, which must include, at a
100 minimum, information related to:
Page 4 of 10
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb719-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 719 2026
101 a. The Federal Government's classification of marijuana as
102 a Schedule I controlled substance.
103 b. The approval and oversight status of marijuana by the
104 Food and Drug Administration.
105 c. The current state of research on the efficacy of
106 marijuana to treat the qualifying conditions set forth in this
107 section.
108 d. The potential for addiction.
109 e. The potential effect that marijuana may have on a
110 patient's coordination, motor skills, and cognition, including a
111 warning against operating heavy machinery, operating a motor
112 vehicle, or engaging in activities that require a person to be
113 alert or respond quickly.
114 f. The potential side effects of marijuana use, including
115 the negative health risks associated with smoking marijuana.
116 g. The risks, benefits, and drug interactions of
117 marijuana.
118 h. That the patient's deidentified health information
119 contained in the physician certification and medical marijuana
120 use registry may be used for research purposes.
121 (b) If a qualified physician issues a physician
122 certification for a qualified patient diagnosed with a
123 qualifying medical condition pursuant to paragraph (2)(k), the
124 physician must submit the following to the applicable board
125 within 14 days after issuing the physician certification:
Page 5 of 10
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb719-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 719 2026
126 1. Documentation supporting the qualified physician's
127 opinion that the medical condition is of the same kind or class
128 as the conditions in paragraphs (2)(a)-(j) or documentation that
129 the patient was prescribed an opioid drug listed as a Schedule
130 II controlled substance in s. 893.03 or 21 U.S.C. s. 812 for
131 such condition.
132 2. Documentation that establishes the efficacy of
133 marijuana as treatment for the condition.
134 3. Documentation supporting the qualified physician's
135 opinion that the benefits of medical use of marijuana would
136 likely outweigh the potential health risks for the patient.
137 4. Any other documentation as required by board rule.
138
139 The department must submit such documentation to the Consortium
140 for Medical Marijuana Clinical Outcomes Research established
141 pursuant to s. 1004.4351.
142 (f) A qualified physician may not issue a physician
143 certification for more than ten three 70-day supply limits of
144 marijuana or more than 20 six 35-day supply limits of marijuana
145 in a form for smoking. The department shall quantify by rule a
146 daily dose amount with equivalent dose amounts for each
147 allowable form of marijuana dispensed by a medical marijuana
148 treatment center. The department shall use the daily dose amount
149 to calculate a 70-day supply.
150 1. A qualified physician may request an exception to the
Page 6 of 10
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb719-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 719 2026
151 daily dose amount limit, the 35-day supply limit of marijuana in
152 a form for smoking, and the 4-ounce possession limit of
153 marijuana in a form for smoking established in paragraph
154 (14)(a). The request shall be made electronically on a form
155 adopted by the department in rule and must include, at a
156 minimum:
157 a. The qualified patient's qualifying medical condition.
158 b. The dosage and route of administration that was
159 insufficient to provide relief to the qualified patient.
160 c. A description of how the patient will benefit from an
161 increased amount.
162 d. The minimum daily dose amount of marijuana that would
163 be sufficient for the treatment of the qualified patient's
164 qualifying medical condition.
165 2. A qualified physician must provide the qualified
166 patient's records upon the request of the department.
167 3. The department shall approve or disapprove the request
168 within 14 days after receipt of the complete documentation
169 required by this paragraph. The request shall be deemed approved
170 if the department fails to act within this time period.
171 (g) A qualified physician must evaluate an existing
172 qualified patient at least once every 104 30 weeks before
173 issuing a new physician certification. A qualified physician who
174 has issued a certification to the patient after conducting an
175 in-person physical examination as defined in subparagraph (a)1.
Page 7 of 10
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb719-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 719 2026
176 may conduct the evaluation through telehealth as defined in s.
177 456.47. A physician must:
178 1. Determine if the patient still meets the requirements
179 to be issued a physician certification under paragraph (a).
180 2. Identify and document in the qualified patient's
181 medical records whether the qualified patient experienced either
182 of the following related to the medical use of marijuana:
183 a. An adverse drug interaction with any prescription or
184 nonprescription medication; or
185 b. A reduction in the use of, or dependence on, other
186 types of controlled substances as defined in s. 893.02.
187 3. Submit a report with the findings required pursuant to
188 subparagraph 2. to the department. The department shall submit
189 such reports to the Consortium for Medical Marijuana Clinical
190 Outcomes Research established pursuant to s. 1004.4351.
191 (i) The department shall monitor physician registration in
192 the medical marijuana use registry and the issuance of physician
193 certifications for practices that could facilitate unlawful
194 diversion or misuse of marijuana or a marijuana delivery device
195 and shall take disciplinary action as appropriate. The
196 department may suspend the registration of a qualified physician
197 in the medical marijuana use registry for a period of up to 2
198 years if the qualified physician:
199 1. fails to comply with this section; or
200 2. Provides, advertises, or markets telehealth services
Page 8 of 10
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb719-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 719 2026
201 before July 1, 2023.
202 (7) IDENTIFICATION CARDS.—
203 (a) The department shall issue medical marijuana use
204 registry identification cards for qualified patients and
205 caregivers who are residents of this state, which must be
206 renewed biennially annually. The department shall establish
207 processes and procedures for issuing medical marijuana use
208 registry identification cards to, and registering as visiting
209 qualified patients, nonresidents who are actively enrolled in
210 the medical cannabis program of another jurisdiction recognized
211 by the department within 1 business day. A visiting qualified
212 patient may engage in all conduct authorized for a qualified
213 patient. The identification cards must be resistant to
214 counterfeiting and tampering and must include, at a minimum, the
215 following:
216 1. The name, address, and date of birth of the qualified
217 patient or caregiver.
218 2. A full-face, passport-type, color photograph of the
219 qualified patient or caregiver taken within the 90 days
220 immediately preceding registration or the Florida driver license
221 or Florida identification card photograph of the qualified
222 patient or caregiver obtained directly from the Department of
223 Highway Safety and Motor Vehicles.
224 3. Identification as a qualified patient or a caregiver.
225 4. The unique numeric identifier used for the qualified
Page 9 of 10
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb719-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 719 2026
226 patient in the medical marijuana use registry.
227 5. For a caregiver, the name and unique numeric identifier
228 of the caregiver and the qualified patient or patients that the
229 caregiver is assisting.
230 6. The expiration date of the identification card.
231 (d) Applications for identification cards must be
232 submitted on a form prescribed by the department. The department
233 may charge a reasonable fee associated with the issuance,
234 replacement, and renewal of identification cards. However, all
235 such fees shall be waived for any veteran who was honorably
236 discharged from the United States Armed Forces. The department
237 shall allocate $10 of the identification card fee to the
238 Division of Research at Florida Agricultural and Mechanical
239 University for the purpose of educating minorities about
240 marijuana for medical use and the impact of the unlawful use of
241 marijuana on minority communities. The department shall contract
242 with a third-party vendor to issue identification cards. The
243 vendor selected by the department must have experience
244 performing similar functions for other state agencies.
245 Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 10 of 10
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb719-00